Utah statutes.
59-7-529.   General violations and penalties.

(1)  Each person who, without fraudulent intent, fails to make, render, sign, or verify any return, or to supply any information within the time required by or under the provisions of this chapter, is liable for a civil penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401 imposed, assessed, and collected by the commission in the same manner as provided by this chapter for delinquent taxes.

(2)  It is unlawful for any person, with intent to evade any tax, to fail to timely remit the full amount of tax required by the provisions of this chapter.  A violation of this section is punishable as provided in Section 59-1-401.

(3)  Each person who knowingly or intentionally makes, renders, signs, or verifies any false or fraudulent return or statement or supplies any false or fraudulent information is guilty of a criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401.

(4)  Each person who, with intent to evade any tax or any requirement of this chapter, fails to make, render, sign, or verify any return, or supply any information within the time required under the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401.

